Massachusetts, session 194th, H2097.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. MGL c. 150 A shall be amended by adding the following to section 5 (C) 2
Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or any other general or special law,
the Department of Labor Relations shall certify the exclusive bargaining representative of any
bargaining unit previously certified by a governmental agency on the basis of majority
representation in the event that the governmental agency determines that the members of such
bargaining unit are no longer employees as defined by applicable statute or otherwise declines
jurisdiction.
of 1